Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 30
IDAHO STATE UNIVERSITY

Section.

33-3001. Establishment of Idaho State University.

There is hereby established in the city of Pocatello, Idaho, an institution of higher education to be designated and known as the Idaho State University, consisting of such colleges, schools or departments as may from time to time be authorized by the state board of education.

33-3002. Purposes of Idaho State University.

Idaho State University shall be a comprehensive institution of higher education giving instruction in undergraduate, professional and graduate education, as approved by the board of trustees.

Courses of instruction in the college of pharmacy shall be such as shall meet the standard requirements as are now, or hereafter may be, recommended by the recognized accrediting agency for schools or colleges of pharmacy, and the usual degrees shall be granted for completion of courses in pharmacy.

The board of trustees may establish professional-technical and other courses or programs, as it may deem necessary, and such courses or programs may be given or conducted on or off campus, or in night schools, summer schools, or by extension courses.

33-3003. Body politic and corporate — Board of trustees.

The Idaho State University is hereby declared to be a body politic and corporate, with its own seal and having power to sue and be sued in its own name. The general supervision, government and control of the Idaho State University is vested in the state board of education, which shall act as the board of trustees of the Idaho State University.

33-3004. Organization, meetings and proceedings of board.

The board of trustees, at its first meeting and annually thereafter, shall organize by electing a chairman, a vice-chairman and a secretary. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but a smaller number may adjourn from time to time. No member of the board shall participate in any proceeding in which he has a pecuniary interest. No vacancy on the board shall impair the right of the remaining trustees to exercise all the powers of the board. Every vote and official act shall be entered of record. The state treasurer shall serve as treasurer of the board. It shall be the duty of the secretary to keep an accurate and detailed account of the doings of the board.

33-3005. Title to property — Acquiring, selling or exchanging property.

All rights and title to property, real or personal, belonging to or vested in the Idaho State University are hereby vested in its board of trustees and their successors. The board of trustees is empowered to acquire, by purchase or exchange, any property which in the judgment of the board is needful for the operation of the Idaho State University, and to dispose of, by sale or exchange, any property which in the judgment of the board is not needful for the operation of the said university.

33-3006. General powers of board of trustees.

The board of trustees of the Idaho State University shall have the following powers:

To adopt rules and regulations for its own government and for that of the university.

To employ a president of the university and, with his advice, to appoint such assistants, deans, instructors, specialists and other employees as are required for the operation of the university; to fix salaries and prescribe duties; and to remove the president or other employees in accordance with the policies and rules of the state board of education.

With the advice of the president, to prescribe the courses and programs of study, the requirements for admission, the time and standard for graduation, and to grant academic degrees to those students entitled thereto.

To accept grants or gifts of money, materials or property of any kind from any governmental agency, or from any person, firm or association, on such terms as may be determined by the grantor.

To cooperate with any governmental agency, or any person, firm or association in the conduct of any educational program, to accept grants or gifts from any source for the conduct of such program; and to conduct such program on or off campus.

To employ architects or engineers in planning the construction, remodeling or repair of any building or property and, whenever no other agency is designated by law so to do, to let contracts for such construction, remodeling or repair and to supervise the work thereof.

To have at all times, general supervision and control of all property, real and personal, appertaining to the university, and to insure the same.

33-3007. Tuition not required

Exceptions. [Repealed.]

33-3008. Board may maintain training school. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2011.

33-3009. Sectarian tests prohibited.

No religious or sectarian test shall be applied in the admission of students, nor in the selection of instructors or other personnel of the university.

33-3010. Funds, property and obligations transferred. — All of the funds and moneys in the dormitory fund and dining hall fund, including any revolving fund, of the Idaho State College, as the same are authorized by sections 33-3701 — 33-3711[, Idaho Code], and all of the unexpended funds heretofore allocated and appropriated to the Idaho State College for the purposes specified therein, and all of the educational, charitable endowment or other endowment funds, holdings, rights, privileges and immunities of the Academy of Idaho, the Idaho Technical Institute, the Southern Branch of the University of Idaho, and the Idaho State College, including the institutions’ endowment funds referred to in sections 66-1103

66-1107[, Idaho Code], and any allocations or appropriations from the normal school fund for the use of the department of education at the Idaho State College, are hereby transferred to, vested in and continued in the Idaho State University and placed under the control of its board of trustees, and appropriated for expenditure by it and shall be paid out by the state treasurer in the manner provided by the constitution and laws of the state of Idaho. All of the property, real and personal, and all of the obligations, legal or moral, of the Idaho State College, are hereby vested in, or shall become the obligations of, the Idaho State University.

33-3011. Existing statutes to be construed.

Wherever the name Academy of Idaho, Idaho Technical Institute, Southern Branch of the University of Idaho, or Idaho State College, shall appear in any statute, such statute hereby is amended to read Idaho State University as fully and completely as though the said name on said statute was specifically amended herein, and all such statutes shall be construed to refer to and mean the Idaho State University.

33-3012. State museum of natural history.

Recognizing the importance of our natural heritage to the citizens of the state of Idaho, and the need for a state museum of natural history which would preserve and interpret natural history objects and which would provide educational services about our natural heritage for both residents and visitors through its own facilities and by supporting and encouraging local and municipal natural history museums throughout the state of Idaho, there is hereby created and established at Idaho State University a state museum of natural history to be known as the Idaho museum of natural history, where tangible objects and documents reflecting our natural heritage may be collected, preserved, studied, interpreted, and displayed for educational and cultural purposes.

The Idaho museum of natural history may receive gifts, contributions, and donations of all kinds for the purpose of support and maintenance of the museum, and may receive tangible objects and specimens for the development of collections, educational programs and exhibits.